District of Columbia statutes.
24-928

Agreement form.

The Director shall promulgate an agreement to be signed by each eligible juvenile offender prior to entering into the BOOT CAMP. The agreement shall describe the terms and conditions of the BOOT CAMP, including a provision that states that participation in the BOOT CAMP is a privilege which may be revoked at any time at the discretion of the Director.

Jan. 27, 1994, D.C. Law 10-67, § 301, 40 DCR 5768
1981 Ed., § 24-828.